Wisconsin, session 2025, AB1238.
do enact as follows:AB1238,11Section 1. Nonstatutory provisions.AB1238,2,82(1) Advance planning for the department of corrections. In the 2025-327 fiscal biennium, from the appropriation under s. 20.867 (2) (r), the building 4commission shall allocate $1,000,000 to develop preliminary plans and 5specifications for a project to evaluate infrastructure needs and to expand existing 6facilities within the state women’s correctional system to satisfy requirements of 7the mother-young child care program under s. 301.049, including by doing the 8following:AB1238,2,129(a) Establishing in one or more of the institutions for women operated by the 10department of corrections a prison nursery program under which inmates eligible 11under the program and children born to them while in custody may reside together 12in the institution and bond, breast-feed if possible, and nurture each other.AB1238,2,1413(b) Supporting the healthy development of infants born to inmates eligible 14under the program and providing comprehensive support for postpartum mothers.AB1238,2,1515